Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 34 Brands and Marks
Subchapter 4

— Beef Promotion and Research

Effective Dates. Acts 1987, No. 3, § 6: Jan. 22, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the best interests of the beef industry in the state that legislation be enacted to comply with and conform to the provisions of the federal law known as the Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, and the federal administrative orders and rules issued pursuant to that act, that this act is designed to enable the Arkansas Beef Council to conform to and comply with the federal law and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-35-401. Purpose.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

The Arkansas law which creates the Arkansas Beef Council authorizes an assessment of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head on all cattle sold in the state;

Since the enactment of the Arkansas law, the United States Congress and the United States Department of Agriculture have established a national beef promotion and research program under which there is an assessment of one dollar ($1.00) per head on all cattle sold;

Under the national program, a qualified state beef council is authorized to retain fifty cents (50¢) of each one dollar ($1.00) per head assessment for financing a state beef promotion and research program if authorized by state law;

The one dollar ($1.00) per head national assessment is currently required to be collected but is subject to a referendum within twenty-two (22) months after the issuance of the beef promotion and research order by the United States Secretary of Agriculture;

It is essential that appropriate legislation be enacted in Arkansas to provide for the collection of the one dollar ($1.00) per head assessment and the retention by the state of fifty cents (50¢) of each one dollar ($1.00) assessment during the interim from the date of the order until the referendum process is completed and thereafter in the event the producers voting at the referendum approve a continuation of the assessment; to further assure that in the event the producers voting at the referendum vote against continuing the one dollar ($1.00) per head assessment, the present Arkansas law providing for an assessment of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head will be automatically reactivated.

Therefore, it is the intent and purpose of this subchapter to suspend the collection of the twenty-five cents (25¢) per head assessment provided for in § 2-35-301 et seq. and to provide for the collection of the one dollar ($1.00) per head national assessment levied for beef promotion and research so long as the national program continues in effect, with fifty cents (50¢) of the assessment to be retained for the Arkansas Beef Council, and to provide that if the producers voting at the referendum provided for in the Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985 and the administrative order issued pursuant thereto vote to discontinue the one dollar ($1.00) per head national assessment, then the provisions of § 2-35-301 et seq. and the assessment of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head of cattle sold in this state will be reactivated the same as if the national program had never existed.

U.S. Code. The federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq.

U.S. Code. The federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq.

The national beef promotion and research program shall in all respects be conducted in Arkansas in conformity with federal law, orders, and regulations regarding the program so long as the national beef promotion and research program is in effect.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a).

U.S. Code. The federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 3, § 1.

2-35-402. Applicability.

(1)The provisions of this subchapter shall remain in effect so long as the national beef promotion and research program established by the federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985 and the administrative orders and rules issued under that act continue in effect.

If the program is terminated as a result of the referendum provided for in that act or for any other reason, the provisions of this subchapter shall expire. Thereafter, the provisions of §2-35-301 et seq. concerning the levy and collection of an assessment on cattle sold in this state to support the Arkansas Beef Promotion and Research Program shall be enforced.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not repeal or modify the provisions of §2-35-301 et seq., but the provisions of §2-35-301 et seq., so far as they relate to the levy and collection of an assessment of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head on cattle sold in this state, shall be suspended until such time as the national beef promotion and research program is terminated.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 3, § 5.

2-35-403. Assessment — Conduct of program.

The assessment levied under the national beef promotion and research program in the amount of one dollar ($1.00) per head of cattle sold shall be collected, reported, and remitted to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration by the persons, in the manner, and at the times prescribed by the federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985 and the administrative orders and rules issued under the provisions of that act.

Records concerning cattle sales and the collection of assessments shall be maintained.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 3, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3294.

2-35-404. Rules.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to adopt appropriate rules not inconsistent with this subchapter or the federal law, orders, and rules regarding the national beef promotion and research program as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of, and to assure compliance with, this subchapter and the federal laws, orders, and rules relating to the national beef promotion and research program.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 3, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 3295.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

2-35-405. Disposition of funds.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall deposit into the State Treasury all funds collected by him or her under this subchapter and the federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985 and the federal administrative orders and rules issued under that act. Beginning with funds collected by him or her on and after the first day of the month next following January 22, 1987, the Treasurer of State shall:

Credit to the National Beef Promotion Account fifty cents (50¢) of each one dollar ($1.00) per head assessment collected;

Deduct three percent (3%) of the remaining funds for credit to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund; and

Credit the remainder of these funds to the State Beef Promotion Account.

Funds credited to the National Beef Promotion Account shall be remitted by the Arkansas Beef Council to the Cattlemen's Beef Promotion and Research Board established in the federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985 in the manner prescribed in that act and in administrative orders and rules issued under that act.

Funds credited to the State Beef Promotion Account shall be used in such manner as the council deems appropriate for Arkansas beef promotion and research and for the operation and maintenance of the council's office and the payment of expenses of the council members in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a).

U.S. Code. The federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 3, § 4; 1997, No. 250, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 3296.

2-35-406. National Beef Promotion Account.

There is created a National Beef Promotion Account in the Arkansas Beef Council Fund.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 3, § 4.

2-35-407. State Beef Promotion Account.

There is created a State Beef Promotion Account in the Arkansas Beef Council Fund.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 3, § 4.

2-34-102. Rev. Stat., ch. 93, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 334; Pope's Dig., § 349; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-802.

2-34-104. Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 336; Pope's Dig., § 351; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-804.

2-34-106. Disputes about earmarks or brands — Impounding of funds.

Subchapter 2

— Brand Registry

2-34-203. Conflicts of brands.

2-34-214. Contracts for administration.